Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2317.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The secretary of health and environment shall establish
a fetal alcohol spectrum disorders task force that shall study the effects and
prevalence of fetal alcohol spectrum disorders in the state of Kansas and
may make recommendations for changes to the law and rules and
regulations therefor.
(b) (1) The task force shall consist of 12 members to be appointed as
follows:
(A) One senator appointed by the president of the senate;
(B) one senator appointed by the minority leader of the senate;
(C) one representative appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(D) one representative appointed by the minority leader of the house
of representatives;
(E) one member appointed by the secretary of the department of
health and environment;
(F) one member appointed by the secretary for children and families
who is a current foster parent of a child with a fetal alcohol spectrum
disorder;
(G) two members appointed by the governor, one of whom is a
professional healthcare professional who works to diagnose children with
fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and one of whom is a behavioral health
professional who works with children diagnosed with fetal alcohol
spectrum disorders;
(H) two members appointed by the commissioner of education, one
of whom is a current special education teacher and one of whom is an
employee or designee from families together, inc.; and
(I) two members appointed by the secretary for aging and disability

HB 2317 2
services who are citizen advocates for children with fetal alcohol spectrum
disorders.
(2) All members shall be appointed by their respective appointing
authorities and reported to the secretary of health and environment on or
before July 15, 2025.
(3) The member appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives shall serve as the chairperson of the task force. The
member appointed by the president of the senate shall serve as the vice
chairperson of the task force.
(4) Legislative members shall serve during the legislative session in
which they are appointed to the task force and remain members of the
legislature in order to retain membership on the task force. Vacancies of
legislative members during a term shall be filled in the same manner as the
original appointment only for the unexpired part of the term. The
appointing authority for a legislative member may remove or reappoint
such member or substitute such member with another appointee at any
time.
(5) All nonlegislative members shall serve until December 31, 2026.
Vacancies of nonlegislative members shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment only for the unexpired part of the term. The
appointing authority for the nonlegislative member may remove or
reappoint such member or substitute such member with another appointee
at any time.
(c) Members of the task force attending meetings authorized by the
task force shall be paid amounts as provided in K.S.A. 75-3223(e), and
amendments thereto. Members' expenses and compensation shall be paid
from any special revenue fund of the Kansas department of health and
environment, as designated by the secretary.
(d) The staff of the office of revisor of statutes, the legislative
research department and the division of legislative administrative services
shall provide such assistance as may be requested by the chairperson.
(e) The provisions of this section shall expire on December 31, 2026.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.